Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 18 Child Maltreatment Act
12-18-1001. Protective custody generally.

A police officer, law enforcement, a juvenile division of circuit court judge during juvenile proceedings concerning the child or a sibling of the child, or a designated employee of the Department of Human Services may take a child into custody or any person in charge of a hospital or similar institution or any physician treating a child may keep that child in his or her custody without the consent of the parent or the guardian, whether or not additional medical treatment is required, if:

However, custody shall not exceed seventy-two (72) hours except in the event that the expiration of seventy-two (72) hours falls on a weekend or holiday, in which case custody may be extended to the end of the next business day following the weekend or holiday.

If the department assesses the health and safety of a child and determines that there is an immediate danger to the health or physical well-being of the child in the care, custody, or control of the legal parent, guardian, or custodian, the department shall place the child into protective custody and shall not direct or allow the legal parent, guardian, or custodian to place the child in the care, custody, or control of another person.

(1)If the department assesses the health and safety of a child and determines that the child cannot safely remain in the care, custody, or control of the legal parent, guardian, or custodian without the implementation of a protection plan, the department may implement a protection plan that allows the child to remain in his or her place of residence and includes services to address the safety of the child.

(A)If a protection plan is implemented under subdivision (d)(1) of this section, then the department shall reassess the health and safety of the child within thirty (30) days of the date on which the protection plan was implemented.

Appoint a dependency-neglect attorney ad litem for the child or children for whom protective custody was taken; and

Designate a member of the court's staff, a party to the juvenile case, or a juvenile officer to immediately provide a copy of the order of appointment and all relevant information from the juvenile case to the attorney ad litem appointed by the court.

Assume custody of every child who is taken into custody under this subchapter;

Assess the health and safety of each child who is taken into custody under this subchapter to determine whether to continue or release custody of the child;

Release custody of a child who is taken into custody under this subchapter if the department determines that custody is no longer required under this section; and

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 25; 2015, No. 1017, §§ 15, 16; 2017, No. 963, § 1; 2019, No. 531, § 6.

12-18-1002. Placement in a foster home.

A county sheriff or chief of police may place a child in his or her custody in a Department of Human Services foster home if:

The county sheriff or chief of police contacts the on-call worker for the department and does not get a return phone call within thirty (30) minutes;

The county sheriff or chief of police contacts the department emergency notification line and does not get a return phone call within fifteen (15) minutes;

The foster parent is personally well-known to the county sheriff or the chief of police;

The county sheriff or chief of police has:

Determined that the foster parent's home is safe and provides adequate accommodations for the child; and

Performed a criminal record and child maltreatment check on the foster parent as required under § 9-28-409; and

On the next business day, the county sheriff or chief of police immediately notifies the department of the time and date that the child was placed in the foster parent's home.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted “in his or her custody” in the introductory language.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 779, § 20.

12-18-1003. Consent for health care and services.

An individual taking a child into custody may give effective consent for medical, dental, health, and hospital services during protective custody.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-1004. Notice when custody is invoked.

In any case in which custody is invoked under this subchapter, the individual taking the child into custody shall immediately notify the Department of Human Services.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2019, No. 531, § 7.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “under this subchapter”, inserted “immediately”, and deleted “in order that a child protective proceeding may be initiated within the time specified in this subchapter” following “Services”.

12-18-1005. Location.

A school, residential facility, hospital, or similar institution where a child may be located shall not require a written order for the Department of Human Services to take a seventy-two-hour hold under this section or § 9-27-313.

Upon notice by the department that a hold has been taken on a child, a school, residential facility, hospital, or similar institution where the child is located shall:

Retain the child until the department takes a hold on the child;

Not notify the parent until the child has been removed by the department; and

Provide the parent or guardian with the name and contact information of the department employee regarding the hold on the child.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment redesignated (a) as (a)(1); and added (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (a)(1) and (a)(2); and substituted “whether or not to exercise custody under this subchapter” for “whether or note to remove a child from the custody of his or her parents” in (b).

Supportive services shall be offered for the purpose of preventing child maltreatment.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “If the Department of Human Services determines that custody under this subchapter is required, the department shall take steps” for “If an investigation under this chapter determines that the child cannot safely remain at home, the Department of Human Services shall take steps” in (a).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-1006. Custody of children generally — Health and safety of the child.

(1)During the course of any child maltreatment investigation, whether conducted by the Department of Human Services or the Division of Arkansas State Police, the Department of Human Services shall assess the health and safety of a child who is subject to the child maltreatment investigation and determine whether or not custody under this subchapter is required.

If the Division of Arkansas State Police is the investigative agency, it shall disclose information as needed for the Department of Human Services to assess the health and safety of a child subject to the child maltreatment investigation and determine whether or not custody under this subchapter is required.

The child's health and safety shall be the paramount concern in determining whether or not to exercise custody under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2015, No. 1026, § 15; 2019, No. 531, § 8.

12-18-1007. Services to families generally.

The Department of Human Services shall have the authority to make referrals or provide services during the course of a child maltreatment investigation.

Any family may request supportive services from the department.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-1008. Removal from home — Procedure.

If the Department of Human Services determines that custody under this subchapter is required, the Department of Human Services shall take steps to remove the child under custody as outlined in this chapter or pursuant to the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq.

After the Department of Human Services has removed the child, the child shall be placed in a licensed or approved foster home, shelter, facility, or an exempt child welfare agency as defined at §9-28-402(12).

No one, including the family, the Department of Human Services, the Division of Arkansas State Police, or local law enforcement shall allow a child to be placed in a nonapproved or nonlicensed foster home, shelter, or facility.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2019, No. 531, § 9.

12-18-1009. When the investigation determines that the child can safely remain at home.

If an investigation under this chapter determines that a child can safely remain at home, the parents retain the right to keep the child at home or to place the child outside the home.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-1010. When a child maltreatment investigation is determined to be true or true but exempted.

If an investigation under this chapter is determined to be true or true but exempted under § 12-18-702(2)(C), the Department of Human Services may open a protective services case.

If the department opens a protective services case, it shall provide services to the family in an effort to prevent additional maltreatment to the child or the removal of the child from the home.

The services shall be relevant to the needs of the family.

If at any time during the protective services case the department determines that the child cannot safely remain at home, it shall take steps to remove the child under custody as outlined in this chapter or under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.

Upon request, the department shall be provided at no cost a copy of the child's public and private school records if the department has an open protective services case.

Upon request, the department shall be provided a copy of the results of radiology procedures, videotapes, photographs, or medical records on a child if the department has an open protective services case.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted “or true but exempted under §12-18-702(2)(C)” in (a).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 675, § 2, provided: “If a law is not enacted establishing a Child Maltreatment Act in Title 12, Chapter 18, of the Arkansas Code in the Eighty-Seventh Session of the General Assembly, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall assign this act to Title 12, Chapter 12, of the Arkansas Code.”

Acts 2009, No. 749, established a Child Maltreatment Act in this chapter. As a result, Acts 2009, No. 675, is codified in this chapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 26.

12-18-1011. When a report of child maltreatment is determined to be unsubstantiated.

If the report of child maltreatment is unsubstantiated, the Department of Human Services may offer supportive services to the family.

The family may accept or reject supportive services at any time.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

Subchapter 11

— Public Disclosure of Information on Fatalities and Near Fatalities

12-18-1101. Procedure if the investigation is pending on a fatality.

Upon request, the Department of Human Services shall release the following information to the general public when an investigation is pending on a report of a fatality of a child to the Child Abuse Hotline:

Age, race, and gender of the child;

Date of the child's death;

Allegations or preliminary cause of death;

County and type of placement of the child at the time of incident leading to the child's death;

Generic relationship of the alleged offender to the child;

Agency conducting the investigation;

Legal action taken by the department;

Services offered or provided by the department presently and in the past; and

Name of the child.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment inserted “type of” preceding “placement” in (4).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 675, §
1; 2013, No. 1181, § 4.

12-18-1102. Procedure if the investigation results in a true report related to a fatality.

Upon request, the Department of Human Services shall release the following information to the general public when the investigative determination is true on a report of a fatality of a child:

A summary of previous child maltreatment investigations.

The disclosure shall not include the name of the offender;

A summary of the current child maltreatment investigation, including:

The nature and extent of the child's present and past injuries;

Medical information pertaining to the death; and

The name of the offender if due process has been satisfied or the offender has been arrested;

All relevant risk and safety assessments completed on the child;

Information about criminal charges, if known; and

Any action taken by the Department of Human Services or the Crimes Against Children Division of the Department of Arkansas State Police, including personnel action and licensing action.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote (1)(B); deleted former (1)(C); and inserted “relevant” preceding “risk” in (3).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 675, §
1; 2013, No. 1181, § 5.

12-18-1103. Procedure if the investigation results in an unsubstantiated report related to a fatality.

Upon request, the Department of Human Services shall release the following information to the general public when the investigative determination is unsubstantiated on a report of a fatality of a child:

A summary of previous child maltreatment investigations.

The disclosure shall not include the name of the offender;

A summary of the current child maltreatment investigation, including medical information pertaining to the death; however, the name of the alleged offender shall not be disclosed;

All relevant risk and safety assessments completed on the child;

Information about criminal charges, if known; and

Any action taken by the Department of Human Services or the Crimes Against Children Division of the Department of Arkansas State Police, including personnel action and licensing action.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote (1)(B); deleted former (1)(C); and inserted “relevant” preceding “risk” in (3).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 675, §
1; 2013, No. 1181, § 6.

12-18-1104. Information not to be released regarding a child fatality.

Concerning the fatality of a child, the Department of Human Services shall not release:

Information on siblings of the child;

Attorney-client communications; or

Any information if release of such information would jeopardize a criminal investigation.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 675, §
1.

12-18-1105. Procedure if the investigation is pending related to a near fatality.

Upon request, the Department of Human Services shall release the following information to the general public when an investigation is pending on a report of a near fatality of a child to the Child Abuse Hotline:

Age, race, and gender of the child;

Date of the near fatality;

Allegations or preliminary cause of the near fatality;

County and type of placement of the child at the time of the near fatality;

Generic relationship of the alleged offender to the child;

Agency conducting the investigation;

Legal action taken by the department; and

Services offered or provided by the department presently and in the past.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment inserted “type of” preceding “placement” in (4) and substituted “presently” for “now” in (8).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 675, §
1; 2013, No. 1181, § 7.

12-18-1106. Procedure if the investigation results in a true report related to a near fatality.

Upon request, the Department of Human Services shall release the following information to the general public when the investigative determination is true on a report of a near fatality of a child:

A nonidentifying summary of any previous child maltreatment investigations;

A nonidentifying summary of the current child maltreatment investigation, including:

The nature and extent of the child's present and past injuries; and

Medical information pertaining to the incident;

Information about criminal charges, if known; and

Any action taken by the Department of Human Services or the Crimes Against Children Division of the Department of Arkansas State Police, including personnel action and licensing action.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 675, §
1.

12-18-1107. Procedure if the investigation results in an unsubstantiated report related to a near fatality.

Upon request, the Department of Human Services shall release the following information to the general public when the investigative determination is unsubstantiated on a report of a near fatality of a child:

A nonidentifying summary of any previous child maltreatment investigations;

A nonidentifying summary of the current child maltreatment investigation;

Information about criminal charges, if known; and

Any action taken by the Department of Human Services or the Crimes Against Children Division of the Department of Arkansas State Police, including personnel action and licensing action.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 675, §
1.

12-18-1108. Information not to be released regarding the near fatality of a child.

Concerning the near fatality of a child, the Department of Human Services shall not release:

Information on siblings of the child;

Attorney-client communications; or

Any information if release of such information would jeopardize a criminal investigation.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted “near” preceding “fatality” in the introductory language.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2013, No. 1257, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings. The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)The criminal justice system is not the appropriate place for sexually exploited children because it serves to retraumatize them and to increase their feelings of low self-esteem;

“(2)Both federal and international law recognize that sexually exploited children are the victims of crime and should be treated as such;

“(3)Sexually exploited children should, when possible, be diverted into services that address the needs of these children outside of the justice system; and

“(4)Sexually exploited children deserve the protection of child welfare services, including diversion, crisis intervention, counseling, and emergency housing services.”

Acts 2013, No. 1257, § 2, provided: “Legislative intent.

“(1)The intent of this act is to protect a child from further victimization after the child is discovered to be a sexually exploited child by ensuring that a child protective response is in place in the state.

“(2)This is to be accomplished by presuming that any child engaged in prostitution or solicitation is a victim of sex trafficking and providing these children with the appropriate care and services when possible.

“(3)In determining the need for and capacity of services that may be provided, the Department of Human Services shall recognize that sexually exploited children have separate and distinct service needs according to gender, and every effort should be made to ensure that these children are not prosecuted or treated as juvenile delinquents, but instead are given the appropriate social services.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 675, §
1; 2011, No. 779, § 21.

Subchapter 12

— Training Regarding Sexually Exploited Children

12-18-1201. Definition.

As used in this subchapter, “sexually exploited child” means a person less than eighteen (18) years of age who has been subject to sexual exploitation because the person:

Is a victim of trafficking of persons under § 5-18-103;

Is a victim of child sex trafficking under 18 U.S.C. § 1591, as it existed on January 1, 2013; or

Engages in an act of prostitution under § 5-70-102 or sexual solicitation under § 5-70-103.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1257, § 8.

12-18-1202. Training regarding sexually exploited children.

The Arkansas Juvenile Officers Association, the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training, or the Prosecutor Coordinator may provide training to intake officers, law enforcement, prosecutors, and any other appropriate staff concerning how to identify a sexually exploited child and how to obtain appropriate services for a sexually exploited child.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1257, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 5874.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy”.

Subchapter 7

— Investigative Findings